Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2408
Judgments for fines, costs, and forfeited recognizances; execution.

It shall be the duty of the clerk of the district court to issue execution for every judgment rendered during the term, for fines and forfeited recognizance, and for the costs in such cases, which remain unpaid and unreplevied; and upon like condition each magistrate shall issue execution forthwith for fines and costs assessed by him.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 525, p. 838;

R.S.1913, § 9195;

C.S.1922, § 10202;

C.S.1929, § 29-2408;

R.S.1943, § 29-2408.

Execution issued by clerk may command commitment to jail for want of goods. Luther v. State, 85 Neb. 674, 124 N.W. 117 (1909).

Police judge has authority to issue execution to collect fine imposed for violation of city ordinance. Cleaver v. Jenkins, 84 Neb. 565, 121 N.W. 992 (1909).